District of Columbia statutes.
5-1115

Funding and compensation.

(a)

There are authorized such funds as may be necessary to support the Board and the Office.

(b)

The establishment of the Board and the Office are dependent upon the availability of appropriated funds.

(c)

Any entitlement to compensation under this chapter for services rendered shall be dependent upon the availability of appropriated funds to pay such compensation.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-208, § 16, 45 DCR 8107

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-925.